Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 5. Garnishment

§§ 1-17-501 through 1-17-505.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1901, ch. 95, §§ 1 through 3, and Laws 1909, ch. 140, §§ 1 and 2, related to garnishment. For present similar provisions, see §§

1-15-401

through

1-15-425

.